dictsource/yfg_rules
// Attempt to implement tones and sandhi rules following the example of Cherokee rather than Mandarin, Cantonese, Hakka or Vietnamese. Following the convention of Chinese historical linguistics, the shang 上 "rising" (31) tone will be denoted by x. Using q for the ru 入 "entering" (53) tone follows the precedent of many Wu language transcriptions. The other letters are semi-arbitrary: the qu 去 "departing" (24) tone will be denoted by j, c for the "dark level" yinping 阴平 (44) tone and b for the "light level" yangping 阳平 (221) tone. The non-etymological sixth tone (35) will be g, the zero tone (55) will be z, and the neutral tone (11) will be d.

// Tones that cause tone 1 to change from 44 to 422
.L01	rg xc zg hd

// Tones that cause tone 4 to change from 24 to 44
.L02	rg xc zg z d

// Tones that cause tone 7 to change from 55 to 44
.L03	rc rg zg xg

// All tones
.L04	rc rg xc zg q hc z d hd

// Semivowels
.L05	i y u

// Initials
.L06	p ph m f v t th l ts tsh s tɕ tS; tɕh tS;h ɕ S; ȵ n^ k kh ŋ N h x ?

// Finals
.L07	i ɿ i[ u v- in un uin yn yin y e ə @ o u ie iə i@ io iu ue uo uəŋ @N əŋ iɛn ien iəŋ i@N yan yen ʮ W ŋ N- a ɑ A ɔ O ai uɑ ua ia iA iɑ iɔ iO ya uai ua en an ɑŋ AN ɔŋ ON iɑŋ iAN iɔŋ iON uan uɔn uɑŋ uɔŋ

// Non-palatized vowels
.L08	e a @ A u O

// IPA substitutions
.replace
	ɕ	S;
	ȵ	n^
	Ǿŋ	N-
	Ǿ	?
	ŋ	N
//	x	h
	ə	@
	ɛ	e
	ʮ	W
	ɿ	i[
	ɑ	A
	ɔ	O
	¹	rc
	²	rg
	³	xc
	⁴	zg
	⁵	q
	⁶	xg
	⁷	z
	⁸	d
	⁹	hd
	

// Initials
.group p
	p	p
	ph	ph

.group f
	f	f

.group v
	v	v

.group m
	m	m

.group t
	t	t
	th	th
	ts	ts
	tsh	tsh
	tS;	tS;
	tS;h	tS;h

.group s
	s	s

.group S;
	S;	S;

.group l
	l	l

.group n
	n^	n^
	ng	N
	
.group N
	N-	N-

.group k
	k	k
	kh	kh

.group h
	h	h

// Finals

.group i
	i[	i[
	in	in
	ie	ie
	ien	ien
	ia	iA
	i@	i@
	i@N	i@N
	iA	iA
	iAN	iAN
	io	iu
	iO	iO
	iON	iON
	i	i

.group y
	L06) y	v-
	ya	ya
	yn	yin
	yin	yin
	yan	yen
	yen	yen

.group e
	e	e
	en	an

.group a
	ai	a
	a	a
	an	an

.group @
	@	@
	@N	@N

.group A
	AN	AN
	A	A

.group u
//	u	v-
	uo	u
	uA	ua
	uai	ua
	un	uin
	uin	uin
	u@N	@N
	uOn	uan
	uan	uan
	uAN	AN
	uON	ON
	u	u

.group O
	O	O
	ON	ON

.group o
	o	o


// TONE SANDHI
// Left tone sandhi (i.e. the tone changes depending on the tone of the next syllable)

// tone 1: deflects 44 --> 422 before tone 2, 3, 4, or 6
.group rc
	rc (_L06L07L01	422
	rcL06L07) rc (_	33
	rcL07) rc (_	33
	rc	44

// tone 2: raises 221 --> 33 except phrase finally; raises 33 --> 44 before phrase final tone 1
.group rg
	rg (_L06L07L04	33
	rg (_L06L07rc_	44
	rg	221

// tone 3: raises 31 --> 24 before tone 2
.group xc
	xc (_L06L07L05	24
	xc (L07L05	24
	xc	31


// tone 4: 24 --> 44 before tone 2, 3 or 4
.group zg
	zg (_L06L07L02	44
	zg (L07L02	44
	zg	24

// tone 5: 53 --> 55 before tone 7; and glottal stop phrase finally
.group q
	q (L06L07z	55
	q (L07z	55
	q	53? $atend
	q	53

// Right tone sandhi (i.e. the tone changes depending on the tone of the previous syllable)
// tone 7 lowers 55 --> 44 after tone 1, 2, 4, or 6
.group z
	L03_L06L07) z	44
	xc_L06L07) z	35
	z	55

.group d
	d	11
